Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.150

Orders, rules, regulations—Enforcement—Availability—Penalty.

(1) It shall be the duty of every organization for emergency management established pursuant to this chapter and of the officers thereof to execute and enforce such orders, rules, and regulations as may be made by the governor under authority of this chapter. Each such organization shall have available for inspection at its office all orders, rules, and regulations made by the governor, or under his or her authority.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, every violation of any rule, regulation, or order issued under the authority of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(b) A second offense hereunder the same is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 211; 1984 c 38 s 14; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 17; 1951 c 178 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.